Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska79-265.02
Student; suspension; classwork and homework; guidelines.

Any student who is suspended shall be given an opportunity to complete any classwork and homework missed during the period of suspension, including, but not limited to, examinations. Each school district shall develop and adopt guidelines that provide any such student with the opportunity to complete classwork and homework. Such guidelines shall not require the student to attend the school district's alternative programs for expelled students in order to complete classwork and homework. The guidelines shall be provided to the student and a parent or guardian at the time of suspension.

Laws 2023, LB705, § 61.